Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-410
Employees; status.

All employees governed by the County Civil Service Commission Act on September 1, 2019, shall retain their employment without the necessity of taking any qualifying examination.

Laws 1971, LB 921, § 9;

R.S.1943, (2012), § 23-2509;

Laws 2019, LB411, § 10.